Montana, session 2025, HB739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Slowing down when approaching agricultural vehicles -- definition DEFINITIONS. (1)
The operator of a moving motor vehicle when approaching an agricultural vehicle that is traveling in the same
direction on a highway:
(a) shall cautiously and carefully reduce the vehicle's speed to the speed of the agricultural
vehicle; and
(b) may pass the agricultural vehicle when it is safe to do so where passing is allowed.
(2) The operator of a moving motor vehicle when approaching an agricultural vehicle traveling in a
different direction shall cautiously and carefully reduce the vehicle's speed to a speed that is one-half the speed
of the posted speed limit. If there are multiple lanes of traffic that the operator of a moving motor vehicle subject
to this subsection (2) may be traveling in, the operator shall move out of the lane closest to the center line when
it is safe to do so.
(3) The operator of an agricultural vehicle behind which a line of vehicles has formed shall turn off
the roadway highway at the nearest area where a sufficient and safe turnout exists in order to permit the
vehicles following it to proceed. If the shoulder of the highway to the right of the slow-moving vehicle is wide
enough and is in a condition that allows safe travel, the operator of the slow-moving agricultural vehicle may
drive onto the shoulder and proceed at a safe speed until the other vehicles have passed.
(4) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 739
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 739
(a) "agricultural Agricultural vehicle" means:
(a)(i) a farm tractor as defined in 61-9-102;
(b)(ii) an implement of husbandry as defined in 61-1-101;
(c)(iii) a self-propelled farm equipment unit;
(d)(iv) a combination of farm tractor and towed unit of farm equipment or implement of husbandry; or
(e)(v) a vehicle used for hauling hay, straw, or both.
(b) "Highway" has the same meaning as provided in 61-1-101.
(c) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as provided in 61-1-101.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
61, chapter 8, part 3, and the provisions of Title 61, chapter 8, part 3, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 739
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 739, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 739
INTRODUCED BY E. BYRNE, B. MITCHELL
AN ACT REVISING LAWS REGARDING AGRICULTURAL VEHICLES; REQUIRING MOTOR VEHICLES TO
SLOW DOWN WHEN APPROACHING AN AGRICULTURAL VEHICLE; REQUIRING AN AGRICULTURAL
VEHICLE TO MOVE OVER WHEN SAFE TO ALLOW VEHICLES TO PASS; AND PROVIDING A DEFINITION
DEFINITIONS.”